Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-3708
Real estate of railroads, public utilities, and common carriers; real estate of restricted entity or agent, trustee, or fiduciary; applicability of sections.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the provisions of sections 76-3703, 76-3706, and 76-3707 shall not apply to the real estate necessary for the construction and operation of railroads, public utilities, and common carriers.

(2) The provisions of sections 76-3703, 76-3706, and 76-3707 shall apply to the real estate of a restricted entity or an agent, trustee, or fiduciary thereof. A restricted entity, or an agent, trustee, or fiduciary thereof, who violates this section shall be in violation of the Foreign-owned Real Estate National Security Act and subject to divestment as prescribed under section 76-3712.

Laws 1889, c. 58, § 4, p. 485;

R.S.1913, § 6276;

Laws 1919, c. 136, § 1, p. 313;

Laws 1921, c. 142, § 3, p. 609;

C.S.1922, § 5690;

C.S.1929, § 76-505;

Laws 1931, c. 128, § 1, p. 361;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 76-505;

R.S.1943, § 76-412;

R.S.1943, (2018), § 76-412;

Laws 2024, LB1301, § 11;

Laws 2025, LB7, § 5.